Illinois, session 104th, HB3642.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. Amends the Officials Convicted of Infamous 5Crimes Act by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 280/1)  (from Ch. 102, par. 120)7    Sec. 1. Any person holding office under the Constitution 8of the State of Illinois and every elected official of local 9government or of any school district who is convicted in any 10court of the State of Illinois or of the United States of a 11felony, bribery, perjury, or other infamous crime, as 12understood in Section 1 of Article XIII of the Constitution of 131970, shall be, upon conviction, ineligible to continue in 14such office unless the person's conviction is reversed under 15this Section or the person's eligibility to hold office is 16restored under Section 29-15 of the Election Code.17    If, subsequently, a final order reverses the conviction, 18eligibility to hold the office, to the extent of the original 19term then remaining, is restored, and the officer shall be 20reinstated, for the duration of the term of office remaining. 21Each such officer shall be promptly repaid all compensation 22withheld from him as a result of his removal. No rights of an 23officer under any pension plan subject to the jurisdiction of   HB3642- 2 -LRB104 08968 RLC 19023 b1this State, of which the officer is a member at the time of his 2ineligibility for office, shall be abridged if the officer is 3returned to office by this Act.4    After conviction and until a final order of reversal under 5this Section or restoration of eligibility to hold office 6under Section 29-15 of the Election Code, there shall be no 7payment of compensation to any such officer. Upon the 8conviction and ineligibility of any person under this Act, a 9successor shall be chosen according to law. This successor 10shall hold office for the remainder of the term or until a 11final order reversing the conviction is entered.12(Source: P.A. 88-419.) 13    Section 10. The Election Code is amended by changing 14Section 29-15 as follows: 15    (10 ILCS 5/29-15)  (from Ch. 46, par. 29-15)16    Sec. 29-15. Conviction deemed infamous. Any person 17convicted of a felony, bribery, perjury, or other an infamous 18crime as such term is defined in Section 124-1 of the Code of 19Criminal Procedure of 1963, as amended, shall thereafter be 20prohibited from holding any office of honor, trust, or profit 21unless the person's conviction is reversed under Section 1 of 22the Officials Convicted of Infamous Crimes Act or the person's 23eligibility to hold office is restored following the 24completion of his or her sentence , unless such person is again   HB3642- 3 -LRB104 08968 RLC 19023 b1restored to such rights by the terms of a pardon for the 2offense, by receiving has received a restoration of rights by 3the Governor, or otherwise according to law. Any time after a 4judgment of conviction is rendered, a person convicted of a 5felony, bribery, perjury, or other an infamous crime may 6petition the Governor for a restoration of rights.7    The changes made to this Section by this amendatory Act of 8the 102nd General Assembly are declarative of existing law. 9(Source: P.A. 102-15, eff. 6-17-21.) 10    Section 15. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 11changing Section 3.1-10-5 as follows: 12    (65 ILCS 5/3.1-10-5)  (from Ch. 24, par. 3.1-10-5)13    Sec. 3.1-10-5. Qualifications; elective office. 14    (a) A person is not eligible for an elective municipal 15office unless that person is a qualified elector of the 16municipality and has resided in the municipality at least one 17year next preceding the election or appointment, except as 18provided in Section 3.1-20-25, subsection (b) of Section 193.1-25-75, Section 5-2-2, or Section 5-2-11.20    (b) A person is not eligible to take the oath of office for 21a municipal office if that person is, at the time required for 22taking the oath of office, in arrears in the payment of a tax 23or other indebtedness due to the municipality or has been 24convicted in any court located in the United States of any   HB3642- 4 -LRB104 08968 RLC 19023 b1infamous crime, bribery, perjury, or other felony, unless such 2person is again restored to his or her rights of citizenship 3that may have been forfeited under Illinois law as a result of 4a conviction, which includes eligibility to hold elected 5municipal office, by the terms of a pardon for the offense, has 6received a restoration of rights by the Governor, or otherwise 7according to law. Any time after a judgment of conviction is 8rendered, a person convicted of an infamous crime, bribery, 9perjury, or other felony may petition the Governor for a 10restoration of rights.11    The changes made to this subsection by this amendatory Act 12of the 102nd General Assembly are declarative of existing law 13and apply to all persons elected at the April 4, 2017 14consolidated election and to persons elected or appointed 15thereafter.16    (b-5) (Blank). 17    (c) A person is not eligible for the office of alderperson 18of a ward unless that person has resided in the ward that the 19person seeks to represent, and a person is not eligible for the 20office of trustee of a district unless that person has resided 21in the municipality, at least one year next preceding the 22election or appointment, except as provided in Section 233.1-20-25, subsection (b) of Section 3.1-25-75, Section 5-2-2, 24or Section 5-2-11.25    (d) If a person (i) is a resident of a municipality 26immediately prior to the active duty military service of that   HB3642- 5 -LRB104 08968 RLC 19023 b1person or that person's spouse, (ii) resides anywhere outside 2of the municipality during that active duty military service, 3and (iii) immediately upon completion of that active duty 4military service is again a resident of the municipality, then 5the time during which the person resides outside the 6municipality during the active duty military service is deemed 7to be time during which the person is a resident of the 8municipality for purposes of determining the residency 9requirement under subsection (a). 10(Source: P.A. 102-15, eff. 6-17-21.) 11    Section 20. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 12changing Section 5-5-5 as follows: 13    (730 ILCS 5/5-5-5)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1005-5-5)14    Sec. 5-5-5. Loss and restoration of rights. 15    (a) Conviction and disposition shall not entail the loss 16by the defendant of any civil rights, except under this 17Section and Sections 29-6 and 29-10 of The Election Code, as 18now or hereafter amended.19    (b) A person convicted before the effective date of this 20amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly of a felony shall 21be ineligible to hold an office created by the Constitution of 22this State until the completion of his sentence.23    (b-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person 24convicted of a felony, bribery, perjury, or other infamous   HB3642- 6 -LRB104 08968 RLC 19023 b1crime for an offense committed on or after the effective date 2of this amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly and 3committed while he or she was serving as a public official in 4this State is ineligible to hold any local public office or any 5office created by the Constitution of this State unless the 6person's conviction is reversed under Section 1 of the 7Officials Convicted of Infamous Crimes Act or until the 8completion of his or her sentence and his or her eligibility to 9hold office is restored under Section 29-15 of the Election 10Code , the person is again restored to such rights by the terms 11of a pardon for the offense, the person has received a 12restoration of rights by the Governor, or the person's rights 13are otherwise restored by law.14    (c) A person sentenced to imprisonment shall lose his 15right to vote until released from imprisonment.16    (d) On completion of sentence of imprisonment or upon 17discharge from probation, conditional discharge or periodic 18imprisonment, or at any time thereafter, all license rights 19and privileges granted under the authority of this State which 20have been revoked or suspended because of conviction of an 21offense shall be restored unless the authority having 22jurisdiction of such license rights finds after investigation 23and hearing that restoration is not in the public interest. 24This paragraph (d) shall not apply to the suspension or 25revocation of a license to operate a motor vehicle under the 26Illinois Vehicle Code.  HB3642- 7 -LRB104 08968 RLC 19023 b1    (e) Upon a person's discharge from incarceration or 2parole, or upon a person's discharge from probation or at any 3time thereafter, the committing court may enter an order 4certifying that the sentence has been satisfactorily completed 5when the court believes it would assist in the rehabilitation 6of the person and be consistent with the public welfare. Such 7order may be entered upon the motion of the defendant or the 8State or upon the court's own motion.9    (f) Upon entry of the order, the court shall issue to the 10person in whose favor the order has been entered a certificate 11stating that his behavior after conviction has warranted the 12issuance of the order.13    (g) This Section shall not affect the right of a defendant 14to collaterally attack his conviction or to rely on it in bar 15of subsequent proceedings for the same offense.16    (h) No application for any license specified in subsection 17(i) of this Section granted under the authority of this State 18shall be denied by reason of an eligible offender who has 19obtained a certificate of relief from disabilities, as defined 20in Article 5.5 of this Chapter, having been previously 21convicted of one or more criminal offenses, or by reason of a 22finding of lack of "good moral character" when the finding is 23based upon the fact that the applicant has previously been 24convicted of one or more criminal offenses, unless:25        (1) there is a direct relationship between one or more 26    of the previous criminal offenses and the specific license   HB3642- 8 -LRB104 08968 RLC 19023 b1    sought; or2        (2) the issuance of the license would involve an 3    unreasonable risk to property or to the safety or welfare 4    of specific individuals or the general public.5    In making such a determination, the licensing agency shall 6consider the following factors:7        (1) the public policy of this State, as expressed in 8    Article 5.5 of this Chapter, to encourage the licensure 9    and employment of persons previously convicted of one or 10    more criminal offenses;11        (2) the specific duties and responsibilities 12    necessarily related to the license being sought;13        (3) the bearing, if any, the criminal offenses or 14    offenses for which the person was previously convicted 15    will have on his or her fitness or ability to perform one 16    or more such duties and responsibilities;17        (4) the time which has elapsed since the occurrence of 18    the criminal offense or offenses;19        (5) the age of the person at the time of occurrence of 20    the criminal offense or offenses;21        (6) the seriousness of the offense or offenses;22        (7) any information produced by the person or produced 23    on his or her behalf in regard to his or her rehabilitation 24    and good conduct, including a certificate of relief from 25    disabilities issued to the applicant, which certificate 26    shall create a presumption of rehabilitation in regard to   HB3642- 9 -LRB104 08968 RLC 19023 b1    the offense or offenses specified in the certificate; and2        (8) the legitimate interest of the licensing agency in 3    protecting property, and the safety and welfare of 4    specific individuals or the general public.5    (i) A certificate of relief from disabilities shall be 6issued only for a license or certification issued under the 7following Acts:8        (1) the Animal Welfare Act; except that a certificate 9    of relief from disabilities may not be granted to provide 10    for the issuance or restoration of a license under the 11    Animal Welfare Act for any person convicted of violating 12    Section 3, 3.01, 3.02, 3.03, 3.03-1, or 4.01 of the Humane 13    Care for Animals Act or Section 26-5 or 48-1 of the 14    Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012;15        (2) the Illinois Athletic Trainers Practice Act;16        (3) the Barber, Cosmetology, Esthetics, Hair Braiding, 17    and Nail Technology Act of 1985;18        (4) the Boiler and Pressure Vessel Repairer Regulation 19    Act;20        (5) the Boxing and Full-contact Martial Arts Act;21        (6) the Illinois Certified Shorthand Reporters Act of 22    1984;23        (7) the Illinois Farm Labor Contractor Certification 24    Act;25        (8) the Registered Interior Designers Act;26        (9) the Illinois Professional Land Surveyor Act of   HB3642- 10 -LRB104 08968 RLC 19023 b1    1989;2        (10) the Landscape Architecture Registration Act;3        (11) the Marriage and Family Therapy Licensing Act;4        (12) the Private Employment Agency Act;5        (13) the Professional Counselor and Clinical 6    Professional Counselor Licensing and Practice Act;7        (14) the Real Estate License Act of 2000;8        (15) the Illinois Roofing Industry Licensing Act;9        (16) the Professional Engineering Practice Act of 10    1989;11        (17) the Water Well and Pump Installation Contractor's 12    License Act;13        (18) the Electrologist Licensing Act; 14        (19) the Auction License Act;15        (20) the Illinois Architecture Practice Act of 1989;16        (21) the Dietitian Nutritionist Practice Act;17        (22) the Environmental Health Practitioner Licensing 18    Act;19        (23) the Funeral Directors and Embalmers Licensing 20    Code;21        (24) (blank);22        (25) the Professional Geologist Licensing Act;23        (26) the Illinois Public Accounting Act; and24        (27) the Structural Engineering Practice Act of 1989.25(Source: P.A. 102-284, eff. 8-6-21; 103-562, eff. 11-17-23.)